Georgia, session 2025_26, HB596.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) The clerk of the State Court of Colquitt County is hereby authorized to charge and collect
a technology fee in an amount of $10.00 as a surcharge upon each fine assessed by the court
for violations of Title 40 of the O.C.G.A., relating to motor vehicles and traffic. Such
technology fees shall be used exclusively to provide for the technological needs of the State
Court of Colquitt County and the Sheriff of Colquitt County. Such uses shall include only
the following:
(1) Computer hardware and software purchases;
(2) Lease, maintenance, and installation of computer hardware and software;
H. B. 596
- 1 -

LC 47 3369/AP
(3) Purchase, lease, maintenance, and installation of audio-visual, imaging, scanning,
facsimile, communications, recording, projection, and printing equipment and software;
and
(4) Procurement of services and equipment for the conservation of court or sheriff records
and the archival of the same to digital contents for public access.
(b) Funds collected pursuant to this section shall be maintained in a segregated account by
the clerk of the state court and shall be used only for the purposes authorized in this section.
(c) The authority to assess a technology fee pursuant to this section shall terminate on
July 1, 2035, and any residual funds remaining in the fund established by this section shall
remain dedicated to general Colquitt County technology needs.
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 596
- 2 -